Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.470

Ultrasounds.

(1) An ultrasound or a similar medical imaging device or procedure may only be provided by: (a) A health care provider holding an active license under one of the chapters listed in RCW 18.130.040 and acting within their scope of practice; or (b) a person acting under the supervision of a health care provider holding an active license under one of the chapters listed in RCW 18.130.040, where all actions performed are within the supervising health care provider's scope of practice.

(2) A violation of this section shall constitute practice without a license and the disciplining authority shall investigate and adjudicate complaints pursuant to RCW 18.130.190.

(3) This section does not apply to the use of an ultrasound by a person on livestock or other animals owned or being raised by that person.

[ 2024 c 329 s 1.]